District of Columbia statutes.
19-1310.06

Reliance on trust instrument.

A trustee who acts in reasonable reliance on the terms of the trust as expressed in the trust instrument is not liable to a beneficiary for a breach of trust to the extent the breach resulted from the reliance.

History

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1006 of the Uniform Trust Code.